Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1125
Private right of action.

The Data Privacy Act shall not be construed as providing a basis for, or being subject to, a private right of action for a violation of the Data Privacy Act or any other law.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 25.